Rhode Island statutes. Title 16 Education
Chapter 42.1 Rhode Island Academy for Gifted and Talented Students

16-42.1-1.
Academy established.

There is created within the department of elementary and secondary education the Rhode Island academy for gifted and talented children, referred to as “the academy”. The role of the academy will be to offer the opportunity for uniquely challenging education for gifted and talented students.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 585, § 1.

16-42.1-2.
Findings.

The general assembly has found and declares that:

There is need to better articulate higher education and secondary education for gifted and talented students through joint college and junior/senior high school programs.

The academic needs of gifted and talented students are critical in the areas of mathematics and science.

The state should encourage programs for gifted and talented students especially on a regional, partnership, or cooperative basis.

There is a special need to serve gifted and talented junior high school students through enrichment programs.

The academy model has proven successful in other education approaches for meeting the needs of gifted and talented students.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 585, § 1.

16-42.1-3.
Operations.

The department of elementary and secondary education shall:

Establish policies and procedures for the academy consistent with this chapter.

Carry out the following responsibilities:

Inform all school systems of the functions and funding of the academy;

Help school systems to develop cooperative, partnership, or regional programs;

Review and approve proposals submitted by local school systems;

Help to create new and productive approaches to providing direct services to meet the needs of gifted and talented students;

Consult with the state advisory committee established in §

16-42-3

on operation of the academy program;

Assure that services funded under the academy’s auspices are direct and supplementary service to gifted and talented students;

Monitor funded programs;

Report on progress of programs funded under the academy.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 585, § 1.

16-42.1-4.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 585, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2001, ch. 86, § 47, effective July 6, 2001.